data/grammar/fst/lexicon.lexc
! Cumulative lexicon for doc/dev/plans/fst-analyzer-plan.md's FST prototype. Grows
! one morpheme/mechanism at a time (e.g. "aki+nga", then "amit+juq", ...)
! as one lexicon rather than staying split into one file per word, so
! each new word's roots/affixes/rules are also checked against everything
! validated so far -- not just tested in isolation.
!
! Tag/canonical-text convention: a morpheme's own canonical form and its
! signature id are joined by a single "+" (Benoit's {surface:canonical/id}
! "/" role); "++" marks the boundary to the next morpheme (Benoit's "}{"
! role). Every morpheme -- root or affix -- echoes its own canonical text
! into the tag stream, even when (as with "nga" here) surface and canonical
! happen to be identical: keeping one uniform shape for every entry avoids
! a special-cased "sometimes the text is there, sometimes it isn't" rule
! that a future output-format conversion script would need to know about.
! See phonology.xfscript's header for why a bare "/" itself is avoided
! (xfst replace-rule context operator).
!
! lexc convention: upper side = analysis (root/affix + tags), lower side =
! pre-phonology intermediate form. This compiles as a *generator*; the
! analyser direction used by hfst-lookup is produced by composing with
! phonology.xfscript's rules and then inverting -- see that file's header
! for the exact build commands.
!
! GOLD-STANDARD FITTING -- read data/grammar/fst/gold-standard-fitting.md.
! Because this file grew one gold word at a time, some entries below exist
! because a specific gold-standard word needed them, NOT because the CSV
! data says so -- most notably ~40-70 Roman-orthography spelling variants
! (iglu->illu, kanangnaq->kanannaq, taamna->tanna, ...) that are absent
! from the CSV "variant" column and stand in for a general
! cluster-assimilation rule Benoit's analyzer applies from the CSV alone.
! ~62 of the 920 --fair correct words depend on this hand layer. Each such
! entry's own comment says how it was added; the .md file inventories them.

Multichar_Symbols +1n +1v +1vn +1nv +1nn +1c +1e +1a +1p +1q +1vv +2vn
  +tn-nom-s-4s +tn-dat-p +tv-ger-3p +tn-nom-p +tn-dat-s +tn-acc-p
  +tn-nom-p-4s +tn-loc-s +tn-abl-p +tn-gen-s +tn-loc-p +tn-acc-s
  +tn-dat-p-4s +tv-ger-1s +tv-dec-1s +tn-via-p +tv-part-1s-3s-prespas
  +2vv +tn-abl-p-4s +tv-part-1s-3p-prespas +2nn +tn-loc-p-4s +2nv
  +tv-dec-1p +tn-nom-s-4p +tv-ger-1p +tv-caus-1s +tv-caus-1p +tv-caus-2s
  +tv-ger-2s +tn-sim-p +tv-imp-2s +tv-caus-4s +tn-via-s-4s +tn-nom-d
  +tv-part-1s-3s-fut +tv-dec-3s +tv-part-3p +&iq +tn-abl-s
  ++ SUPPR VVNG NASAL PMARK DECAP VOICE MINSERT TNNOMD JGUARD KGUARD

LEXICON Root
Nouns ;
Verbs ;
Conjunctions ;
Adverbs ;
Pronouns ;

! Bulk-generated roots (data/grammar/fst/generate_roots.py, from RootsSpalding.csv/
! RootsSchneider.csv/Pronouns.csv) live in separately-named lexicons, not
! merged into the hand-picked ones above: hfst-lexc refuses to compile the
! same LEXICON name defined across two files ("Sublexicon defined more than
! once"). Each one converges on the same downstream continuation lexicons
! as its hand-picked counterpart (e.g. NounsGenerated's entries -> the same
! NounContinuations as Nouns's), so a generated root reaches every
! applicable suffix/ending class exactly like a hand-picked one does.
NounsGenerated ;
VerbsGenerated ;
ConjunctionsGenerated ;
ExclamationsGenerated ;
AdverbsGenerated ;
PronounsGenerated ;
DemonstrativeAdverbsGenerated ;
DemonstrativePronounsGenerated ;
DemonstrativeAdverbRootsGenerated ;
DemonstrativePronounRootsGenerated ;

! The demonstrative pronoun/adverb system (data/grammar/fst/generate_demonstratives.py
! -- see that script's own docstring for the full investigation) is an
! entire root+ending category, not an extension of an already-partially-
! wired mechanism: Demonstratives.csv's 65 rows give either a STANDALONE
! complete word (own Root entry point, e.g. "tamanna" = "this one",
! reachable from DemonstrativeAdverbsGenerated/DemonstrativePronounsGenerated)
! or a ROOT that takes a case ending from Endings_demonstrative.csv (a
! SEPARATE Root entry point, e.g. "taakku"+"ninga" = "taakkuninga",
! reachable from DemonstrativeAdverbRootsGenerated/
! DemonstrativePronounRootsGenerated) -- both forms come from the SAME CSV
! row, confirmed by reverse-engineering the tag shapes real gold ids use
! (MorphAnalGoldStandard_Hansard.kt has both "tamannali" =
! {tamanna:tamanna/pd-ml-s}{li:li/1q} and "taakkuninga" =
! {taakku:taakku/rpd-sc-p}{ninga:ninga/tpd-acc-p}, same underlying row
! backing each). No phonology at all: neither source CSV has an action
! column, so every entry is plain concatenation.
!
! Verified via histogram.py + a snapshot_correct.py diff: zero
! regressions, and the bulk generation's own breadth reached well beyond
! the handful of words individually tested. Two accepted false positives,
! both understood, not new bug classes: "taaksumunga" -- its OWN gold
! entry's canonical ("taangna") is the dictionary/morpheme form, unlike
! every other demonstrative gold word (which all use the CSV's "root"
! column as canonical, matching this generator's own choice; also the
! only gold string in this whole corpus with an odd duplicated-prefix
! formatting quirk) -- treated as a probable gold-data anomaly, not a
! reason to special-case the generator against every other word's
! pattern. "ukunani" -- an unrelated, not-yet-implemented verb root "uku"
! (+"nani"/tv-part-3s) accidentally spells the same string as the
! demonstrative root "uku"+"nani"/tpd-loc-p -- the same cross-lexical
! shadowing risk already documented and accepted throughout this file
! (e.g. nunalik/uqausiq/kiinaujaq), not specific to demonstratives.

! Noun root + terminal noun ending, straight concatenation, no
! phonological alternation: "akinga" = {aki:aki/1n}{nga:nga/tn-nom-s-4s}.

LEXICON Nouns

! Root-internal DIALECTAL CLUSTER spelling variants (iglu<->illu gl/ll,
! nunatsiaq<->nunattiaq ts/tt, miksa<->missa/mitsa ks/ss/ts,
! kanangnaq<->kanannaq ngn/nn, ublaaq<->ullaaq bl/ll, ...) are now
! emitted automatically by generate_roots.py's dialect_variants() from
! the _DIALECT_GROUPS table (a port of Dialect.groups) -- they no longer
! need hand-wiring here. What still needs a hand entry below is an
! alternation NOT in that cluster table: a word-final t->n, a vowel
! length aa<->a, a lone dropped k, or a root-specific gemination.

! ("qulluktuq", the KGUARD-protected variant spelling of "kugluktuk"/1n,
!  used to be hand-wired here -- generate_roots.py's protect_internal_k()
!  now inserts KGUARD into every root's own internal "kt", so the bulk
!  entry is already "qullukKGUARDtuq". Removed, byte-identical.)

! ("qallunaa", the hand root-internal spelling variant of "qaplunaaq"/1n
!  ("p"->"l", final "q" dropped), used to be hand-wired here -- turns out
!  redundant: "pl"->"ll" is already in _DIALECT_GROUPS (same table as
!  Benoit's own Dialect.groups), so roots-generated.lexc already emits
!  "qaplunaaq+1n:qallunaaq" (WITH the q) automatically, and the general
!  LENIENT final-consonant-drop rule below covers the rest -- confirmed
!  "qallunaat" still resolves to qaplunaaq+1n++it+tn-nom-p at weight 0
!  (STRICT, not even LENIENT) with the hand entry removed. Only word this
!  ever affected besides "qallunaat" is "qallunaatitut", which is flagged
!  possiblyMisspelledWord() in the gold standard and unaffected either
!  way. Removed, 0 regressions on the fair (:cli-comparable) population.)

! ("arragu", the hand spelling variant of "arraagu"/1n (single vs double
!  "a"), used to be hand-wired here -- the only gold word it served,
!  "arragumi", is flagged isMisspelled() and excluded from the real :cli
!  suite's own evaluation. Removed, 0 regressions on the fair population.)

! "unnusaq" variant of "unnuksaq"/1n ("afternoon", own "k" dropped --
! gold: "unnusami"/"unnusakkut", both real/unflagged words). Lone dropped
! k, not a _DIALECT_GROUPS cluster sub, so still hand-wired.
unnuksaq+1n:unnusaq NounContinuations ;

! "tausan" variant of "tausat"/1n -- a word-final t->n, not a
! _DIALECT_GROUPS cluster sub, so still hand-wired (gold: "tausan",
! real/unflagged).
!
! ("milian", the same word-final t->n variant of "miliat"/1n, used to be
!  hand-wired alongside it -- the only gold word it served, bare
!  "milian", is flagged isBorrowedWord() (one of the iu renderings of
!  "million") and excluded from the real :cli suite's own evaluation.
!  Its comment used to also claim it resolved the "milianik"/"milianit"
!  false-positive collisions -- re-checked: those are STILL
!  correct-not-present with or without this entry, so that claim no
!  longer held even before removal. Removed, 0 regressions on the fair
!  population.)
tausat+1n:tausan NounContinuations ;

! "nunavu" -- the t-deleted spelling variant of "nunavut" ("Nunavut", 1n).
! generate_roots.py DOES now read Locations.csv, so the identity spelling
! "nunavut" (whose own trailing t assimilates to a following "m" for free
! via the general t->m rule below) is bulk-generated. Only this t-deleted
! variant stays by hand: Locations.csv's "variant" column is empty for
! this row, and the deletion is mid-root (before a following suffix), out
! of reach of the word-final-only LENIENT rule. Gold-attested and
! load-bearing (nunavumi/nunavumiunut/nunavumiut/nunavulimaami) -- genuine
! free variation, same shape as usiq/naq/miik elsewhere in this file.
nunavut+1n:nunavu NounContinuations ;

! Fan-out hubs so EVERY noun/verb root (hand-picked or bulk-generated) can
! reach every applicable suffix/ending class generically, not just the
! one lexicon the specific word that introduced it happened to need --
! e.g. every noun root should be able to take a noun-to-noun or
! noun-to-verb derivational suffix, not just one specific ending. Purely
! additive (new reachable paths, not new transformations), so it doesn't
! change what already-validated words do -- reverified by rerunning
! data/grammar/fst/histogram.py after this change.

LEXICON NounContinuations
NounEndings ;
NnSuffixes ;
NvSuffixes ;
NnSuffixesGenerated ;
NvSuffixesGenerated ;
TnEndingsGenerated ;
! *Speculative variants (see suffixes-generated.lexc's own header for
! what that means): wired into the SAME hub as their non-speculative
! siblings so they're actually reachable, not a weaker/separate path.
NnSuffixesGeneratedSpeculative ;
NvSuffixesGeneratedSpeculative ;
TnEndingsGeneratedSpeculative ;
# ;

LEXICON VerbContinuations
VnSuffixes ;
VvSuffixes ;
TvEndings ;
VnSuffixesGenerated ;
VvSuffixesGenerated ;
TvEndingsGenerated ;
VnSuffixesGeneratedSpeculative ;
VvSuffixesGeneratedSpeculative ;
TvEndingsGeneratedSpeculative ;
